Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-213
Constitutional convention; proclamation; notice; how conducted; returns.

The election shall be proclaimed and notice thereof given by the same persons, and in the same manner, as in general elections, and the election shall in all respects be conducted, the returns thereof made, and the results certified as is provided by law in the election of members to the Legislature, except as otherwise provided by sections 49-212 to 49-234.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 2, p. 548.